Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.790

Effective communication—Intent.

The legislature finds that the quality of undergraduate education is enhanced by association with graduate assistants from other countries who can effectively communicate their knowledge and diverse cultural backgrounds.

It is the intent of the legislature to assist the institutions in their effort to improve the quality of undergraduate education at the state's four-year colleges and universities. Attainment of an excellent education is facilitated when communication is clear, concise, sensitive to cultural differences, and demonstrative of proven pedagogical skills. It is the further intent of the legislature to assure students and parents that graduate teaching assistants at our state institutions of higher education are able to communicate effectively and understandably with undergraduate students.

[ 1991 c 228 s 1.]